Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0389.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 17b. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 752 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 752.53(3) Person C Driver approaching pedestrian crossing in grossly negligent manner causing the death of a blind pedestrian 10 752.53(4) Property E Driver approaching pedestrian crossing in grossly negligent manner causing the death of a blind pedestrian's service animal 5 752.272a(2)(c) 752.272a(4)(c) Pub saf F Sale or distribution of nitrous oxide device â 2 or more prior convictions 4 752.365(3) Pub ord G Obscenity â subsequent offense 2 752.541 Pub saf D Riot 10 752.542 Pub saf D Incitement to riot 10 752.542a Pub saf D Riot in state correctional facilities 10 752.543 Pub saf G Unlawful assembly 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 388 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.